en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > General Purpose Athletic Equipment > Ball Pump Accessories: Ball Pressure Gauges; Ball Pump Adapters; Ball Pump Hoses; Ball Pump Needles
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Splošna športna oprema > Dodatki za tlačilke za žoge: Merilniki tlaka za žoge; Adapterji za črpalke za žoge; Cevi za črpalke za žoge; Igle za tlačilke za žoge
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 다용도 운동 장비 > 공 펌프 부대용품: 볼 압력계; 볼 펌프 어댑터; 볼 펌프 호스; 공 펌프 바늘
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Yleistarvikkeet urheiluun > Pallopumpun tarvikkeet: Pallojen painemittarit; Pallopumpun sovittimet; Pallopumpun letkut; Pallopumpun neulat
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Algemene atletiekbenodigdheden > Accessoires voor balpompen: Baldrukmeters; Ballenpompadapters; Ballenpompslangen; Naalden voor balpompen
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Idrottsutrustning för allmänt bruk > Tillbehör för bollpumpar: Tryckmätare för bollar; Bollpumpsadaptrar; Bollpumpsslangar; Nålar för bollpumpar
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Спортивное оборудование общего назначения > Аксессуары для насосов для мячей: Манометры для мячей; Переходники для насосов для мячей; Шланги для насосов для мячей; Иглы для насосов для мячей
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Sprzęt ogólnosportowy > Akcesoria do pompek: Ciśnieniomierze do piłek; Adaptery do pompek do piłek; Wężyki do pompek do piłek; Igły do pompek
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Genel Amaçlı Spor Malzemeleri > Top Pompası Aksesuarları: Top basınç göstergeleri; Top pompası adaptörleri; Top pompası hortumları; Top Pompası İğneleri
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Sportska oprema opće namjene > Pribor za pumpu za loptu: Mjerači tlaka za lopte; Adapteri za pumpu za loptu; Crijeva za pumpu za loptu; Igle za pumpanje lopte
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αθλητικός εξοπλισμός γενικής χρήσης > Αξεσουάρ αντλιών μπαλών: Μετρητές πίεσης μπάλας; Αντάπτορες τρόμπας μπάλας; Σωλήνες τρόμπας μπάλας; Βελόνες αντλιών μπαλών
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Általános célú atlétikai felszerelések > Labdapumpa-kiegészítők: Labdanyomásmérők; Labdapumpa-adapterek; Labdapumpa-tömlők; Labdapumpatűk
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > スポーツ競技用多目的器材 > ボール用空気入れ関連用品: ボール用空気圧計; ボール用ポンプアダプター; ボールポンプホース; ボール用空気針
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Attrezzature sportive generiche > Accessori per pompe palle: Manometri per palloni; Adattatori per pompe per palloni; Tubi per pompe per palloni; Aghi per pompe palle
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อุปกรณ์กีฬาสำหรับวัตถุประสงค์ทั่วไป > อุปกรณ์ปั๊มบอล: เกจวัดความดันลูกบอล; อะแดปเตอร์ที่สูบลมลูกบอล; สายยางที่สูบลมลูกบอล; เข็มปั๊มบอล
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 一般體育配備 > 球用打氣筒配件: 球類測壓計; 打氣筒轉接頭; 打氣筒軟管; 球用打氣筒球針
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Treningsutstyr for generelle formål > Utstyr for pumping av baller: Balltrykksmålere; Ballpumpeadaptere; Ballpumpeslanger; Nåler for pumping av baller
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Equipamento para esportes em geral > Acessórios para bomba de ar: Medidores de pressão para bolas; Adaptadores para bombas de ar; Mangueiras para bombas de ar; Agulhas para bomba de ar
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Bendrosios paskirties sportinė įranga > Kamuolių pompų priedai: Kamuolių slėgio matuokliai; Kamuolių pompų adapteriai; Kamuolių pompų žarnos; Kamuolių pompų adatos
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Víceúčelové atletické vybavení > Pumpičky na míče – příslušenství: Tlakoměry na míče; Adaptéry pro pumpičky na míče; Hadičky k pumpičkám na míče; Pumpičky na míče – jehly
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Thiết bị thể thao thông dụng > Phụ kiện bơm banh: Đồng hồ đo áp suất bóng; Đầu chuyển đổi bơm bóng; Vòi bơm bóng; Kim bơm banh, bóng
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Equipamiento para atletismo de uso general > Accesorios para bombines de balones: Medidores de presión para balones; Adaptadores para infladores de balones; Mangueras para infladores de balones; Agujas de bombines para balones
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 通用体育用品 > 球类打气筒配件: 球压计; 打气筒转接头; 打气筒软管; 球类打气筒气针
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Спортно оборудване с общо предназначение > Аксесоари за помпа за топка: Манометри за налягане на топки; Адаптери за помпи за топка; Маркучи за помпи за топки; Игли за помпа за топка
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Equipamento desportivo geral > Acessórios de bombas para bolas: Medidores de pressão para bolas; Adaptadores para bombas de bolas; Mangueiras para bombas de bolas; Agulhas de bombas para bolas
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Matériel de sport > Accessoires de gonflage de ballons: Manomètres pour ballon; Adaptateurs pour pompe à ballon; Tuyaux pour pompe à ballon; Aiguilles de gonflage de ballons
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Allgemeine Sportartikel > Ballpumpenzubehör: Ball-Druckmessgeräte; Ballpumpen-Adapter; Ballpumpenschläuche; Ballpumpenaufsätze
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Echipament sportiv de uz general > Accesorii pompă pentru mingi: Manometre pentru mingi; Adaptoare pentru pompe de umflat mingi; Furtunuri pentru pompe de umflat mingi; Ace pentru pompă mingi
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Športové vybavenie na všeobecné použitie > Príslušenstvo k pumpám na lopty: Tlakomery na lopty; Adaptéry na guľové pumpy; Hadice na guľové pumpy; Ihly k pumpám na lopty
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Træningsudstyr > Tilbehør til boldpumper: Boldtrykmålere; Adaptere til boldpumper; Slanger til boldpumper; Nåle til boldpumper